District of Columbia statutes.
7-1131.06

Appointment and duties of Chief Financial Officer.

The Department shall have a Chief Financial Officer (“Department CFO”), who shall be appointed by the Chief Financial Officer of the District of Columbia (“District’s CFO”) in collaboration with the Director. The Department CFO shall:

(1)

Be qualified by experience and training to carry out accounting, budgeting, and financial management functions;

(2)

Directly report to, be ultimately responsible to, and be under the supervisory direction of the District’s CFO, through the Director;

(3)

Engage in the accounting, budgeting, and financial management functions authorized by the District’s CFO;

(4)

Serve as a member of the Department’s management team;

(5)

Advocate for and advance the policy objectives of the Director, to the extent consistent with the Department CFO’s ultimate responsibility to and supervisory control by the District’s CFO; and

(6)

Be subject to evaluation, discipline, and transfer by the District’s CFO, in collaboration with the Director.

Dec. 18, 2001, D.C. Law 14-56, § 106, 48 DCR 7674
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 6 of Department of Mental Health Establishment Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-51, October 30, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 10807).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 6 of Department of Mental Health Establishment Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-55, May 2, 2001, 48 DCR 4390).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 6 of Department of Mental Health Establishment Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-101, July 23, 2001, 48 DCR 7123).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 106 of Mental Health Service Delivery Reform Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-144, October 23, 2001, 48 DCR 9947).